src/buckwalter scripts/convert2hunspell/arabic_utf8_alias.aff
FLAG num
AM IVPref-AnA-li>a+ # 221
AM IVPref-Antm-tu+ # 222
AM IVPref-Antm-litu+ # 223
AM +NSuff-i # 224
AM +IVSuff-|k # 225
AM +PVSuff-~th # 226
AM +IVSuff-|n # 227
AM +NSuff-wn # 228
AM +Suff-0 # 229
AM +NSuff-atAn # 230
AM +IVSuff-ny-nA # 231
AM +IVSuff-wA # 232
AM +FWSuff-~A # 233
AM +IVSuff-Ah # 234
AM +NSuff-|tK # 235
AM +IVSuff-h # 236
AM +NSuff-|tN # 237
AM +IVSuff-nh # 238
AM +IVSuff-k # 239
AM +IVSuff-An # 240
AM +IVSuff-~n # 241
AM +IVSuff-A # 242
AM +IVSuff-nk # 243
AM +NSuff-|ti # 244
AM +NSuff-Ah # 245
AM +NSuff-ap # 246
AM +PVSuff-awA # 247
AM +IVSuff-awnh # 248
AM +NSuff-An # 249
AM +FWSuff-~a # 250
AM +NSuff-iyh # 251
AM +IVSuff-awnk # 252
AM +IVSuff-wh # 253
AM +NSuff-Ati # 254
AM +IVSuff-wk # 255
AM +NSuff-At # 256
AM +IVSuff-awA # 257
AM +NSuff-|th # 258
AM +IVSuff-wn # 259
AM +NSuff-|-ni # 260
AM +NSuff-|tu # 261
AM +CVSuff-yh # 262
AM +IVSuff-|h # 263
AM +PVSuff-0ah # 264
AM +PVSuff-awh # 265
AM +NSuff-iyna # 266
AM +IVSuff-awh # 267
AM +IVSuff-| # 268
AM +IVSuff-awk # 269
AM +NSuff-api # 270
AM +NSuff-wh # 271
AM +NSuff-apK # 272
AM +IVSuff-ynh # 273
AM +PVSuff-ath # 274
AM +IVSuff-n # 275
AM +NSuff-tayn # 276
AM +NSuff-ayn # 277
AM +IVSuff-awn # 278
AM +IVSuff-wnh # 279
AM +IVSuff-wnk # 280
AM +NSuff-atAh # 281
AM +NSuff-ath # 282
AM +PVSuff-uwA # 283
AM +IVSuff-~nh # 284
AM +IVSuff-y # 285
AM +IVSuff-~nk # 286
AM +PVSuff-~nh # 287
AM +PVSuff-uwh # 288
AM +PVSuff-ah # 289
AM +PVSuff-Ah # 290
AM +PVSuff-at # 291
AM +NSuff-iy # 292
AM +NSuff-|t # 293
AM +IVSuff-|nh # 294
AM +IVSuff-Ak # 295
AM +IVSuff-|nk # 296
AM +FWSuff-A # 297
AM +FWSuff-nA-us # 298
AM +NSuff-Atu # 299
AM +NSuff-K # 300
AM +FWSuff-~iy # 301
AM +PVSuff-A # 302
AM +FWSuff-k # 303
AM +NSuff-h # 304
AM +NSuff-apF # 305
AM +PVSuff-a # 306
AM +NSuff-apN # 307
AM +PVSuff-n # 308
AM +PVSuff-t # 309
AM +NSuff-apa # 310
AM +PVSuff-| # 311
AM +IVSuff-yh # 312
AM +NSuff-|h # 313
AM +NSuff-apu # 314
AM +FWSuff-iy-I # 315
AM +NSuff-ayh # 316
AM +CVSuff-wA # 317
AM +PVSuff-|h # 318
AM +PVSuff-th # 319
AM +PVSuff-0a # 320
AM +FWSuff-hi # 321
AM +NSuff-N # 322
AM +CVSuff-wh # 323
AM +PVSuff-nh # 324
AM +CVSuff-oh # 325
AM +PVSuff-~n # 326
AM +NSuff-tay # 327
AM +PVSuff-~t # 328
AM +NSuff-a # 329
AM +CVSuff-o # 330
AM +NSuff-AtK # 331
AM +NSuff-u # 332
AM +CVSuff-y # 333
AM +NSuff-Ath # 334
AM +IVSuff-Anh # 335
AM +FWSuff-iy-me # 336
AM +NSuff-AF # 337
AM +IVSuff-Ank # 338
AM +FWSuff-hu-he # 339
AM +FWSuff-hu-him # 340
AM +FWSuff-ya # 341
AM +NSuff-AtN # 342
AM +IVSuff-yn # 343
AM +FWSuff-nA-we # 344
AM +FWSuff-niy-I # 345
AM +FWSuff-niy-me # 346
SET UTF-8
NEEDAFFIX 1
CIRCUMFIX 2
PFX 1013 Y 6
PFX 1013 0 يُ/143 . 160
PFX 1013 0 وَيُ/143 . 160
PFX 1013 0 فَيُ/143 . 160
PFX 1013 0 سَيُ/143 . 160
PFX 1013 0 وَسَيُ/143 . 160
PFX 1013 0 فَسَيُ/143 . 160
PFX 1056 Y 12
PFX 1056 0 آ/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 وَآ/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 فَآ/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 سَآ/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 وَسَآ/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 فَسَآ/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 آ/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 وَآ/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 فَآ/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 سَآ/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 وَسَآ/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 فَسَآ/143 . 161
PFX 1041 Y 3
PFX 1041 0 لِتُ/143 . 162
PFX 1041 0 وَلِتُ/143 . 162
PFX 1041 0 فَلِتُ/143 . 162
PFX 1004 Y 1
PFX 1004 0 لَ/143 . 163
PFX 1018 Y 3
PFX 1018 0 لِيَ/143 . 164
PFX 1018 0 وَلِيَ/143 . 164
PFX 1018 0 فَلِيَ/143 . 164
PFX 1025 Y 3
PFX 1025 0 لِيُ/143 . 165
PFX 1025 0 وَلِيُ/143 . 165
PFX 1025 0 فَلِيُ/143 . 165
PFX 1008 Y 3
PFX 1008 0 لِل/143 . 166
PFX 1008 0 وَلِل/143 . 166
PFX 1008 0 فَلِل/143 . 166
PFX 1044 Y 3
PFX 1044 0 لِتَ/143 . 167
PFX 1044 0 وَلِتَ/143 . 167
PFX 1044 0 فَلِتَ/143 . 167
PFX 1058 Y 6
PFX 1058 0 لِأُ/143 . 168
PFX 1058 0 وَلِأُ/143 . 168
PFX 1058 0 فَلِأُ/143 . 168
PFX 1058 0 لِأُ/143 . 168
PFX 1058 0 وَلِأُ/143 . 168
PFX 1058 0 فَلِأُ/143 . 168
PFX 1022 Y 3
PFX 1022 0 لِيَ/143 . 169
PFX 1022 0 وَلِيَ/143 . 169
PFX 1022 0 فَلِيَ/143 . 169
PFX 1003 Y 3
PFX 1003 0 لِ/143 . 170
PFX 1003 0 وَلِ/143 . 170
PFX 1003 0 فَلِ/143 . 170
PFX 1020 Y 3
PFX 1020 0 لِيَ/143 . 171
PFX 1020 0 وَلِيَ/143 . 171
PFX 1020 0 فَلِيَ/143 . 171
PFX 1005 Y 1
PFX 1005 0 لَ/143 . 172
PFX 1032 Y 6
PFX 1032 0 تَ/143 . 173
PFX 1032 0 وَتَ/143 . 173
PFX 1032 0 فَتَ/143 . 173
PFX 1032 0 سَتَ/143 . 173
PFX 1032 0 وَسَتَ/143 . 173
PFX 1032 0 فَسَتَ/143 . 173
PFX 1054 Y 12
PFX 1054 0 أَ/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 وَأَ/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 فَأَ/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 سَأَ/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 وَسَأَ/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 فَسَأَ/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 أَ/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 وَأَ/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 فَأَ/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 سَأَ/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 وَسَأَ/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 فَسَأَ/143 . 174
PFX 1010 Y 6
PFX 1010 0 يَ/143 . 175
PFX 1010 0 وَيَ/143 . 175
PFX 1010 0 فَيَ/143 . 175
PFX 1010 0 سَيَ/143 . 175
PFX 1010 0 وَسَيَ/143 . 175
PFX 1010 0 فَسَيَ/143 . 175
PFX 1019 Y 3
PFX 1019 0 لِيُ/143 . 176
PFX 1019 0 وَلِيُ/143 . 176
PFX 1019 0 فَلِيُ/143 . 176
PFX 1045 Y 3
PFX 1045 0 لِتُ/143 . 177
PFX 1045 0 وَلِتُ/143 . 177
PFX 1045 0 فَلِتُ/143 . 177
PFX 1028 Y 6
PFX 1028 0 تَ/143 . 178
PFX 1028 0 وَتَ/143 . 178
PFX 1028 0 فَتَ/143 . 178
PFX 1028 0 سَتَ/143 . 178
PFX 1028 0 وَسَتَ/143 . 178
PFX 1028 0 فَسَتَ/143 . 178
PFX 1023 Y 3
PFX 1023 0 لِيُ/143 . 179
PFX 1023 0 وَلِيُ/143 . 179
PFX 1023 0 فَلِيُ/143 . 179
PFX 1034 Y 6
PFX 1034 0 تَ/143 . 180
PFX 1034 0 وَتَ/143 . 180
PFX 1034 0 فَتَ/143 . 180
PFX 1034 0 سَتَ/143 . 180
PFX 1034 0 وَسَتَ/143 . 180
PFX 1034 0 فَسَتَ/143 . 180
PFX 1021 Y 3
PFX 1021 0 لِيُ/143 . 181
PFX 1021 0 وَلِيُ/143 . 181
PFX 1021 0 فَلِيُ/143 . 181
PFX 1033 Y 6
PFX 1033 0 تُ/143 . 182
PFX 1033 0 وَتُ/143 . 182
PFX 1033 0 فَتُ/143 . 182
PFX 1033 0 سَتُ/143 . 182
PFX 1033 0 وَسَتُ/143 . 182
PFX 1033 0 فَسَتُ/143 . 182
PFX 1006 Y 3
PFX 1006 0 ال/143 . 183
PFX 1006 0 وَال/143 . 183
PFX 1006 0 فَال/143 . 183
PFX 1055 Y 12
PFX 1055 0 أُ/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 وَأُ/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 فَأُ/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 سَأُ/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 وَسَأُ/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 فَسَأُ/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 أُ/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 وَأُ/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 فَأُ/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 سَأُ/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 وَسَأُ/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 فَسَأُ/143 . 184
PFX 1011 Y 6
PFX 1011 0 يُ/143 . 185
PFX 1011 0 وَيُ/143 . 185
PFX 1011 0 فَيُ/143 . 185
PFX 1011 0 سَيُ/143 . 185
PFX 1011 0 وَسَيُ/143 . 185
PFX 1011 0 فَسَيُ/143 . 185
PFX 1026 Y 6
PFX 1026 0 تَ/143 . 186
PFX 1026 0 وَتَ/143 . 186
PFX 1026 0 فَتَ/143 . 186
PFX 1026 0 سَتَ/143 . 186
PFX 1026 0 وَسَتَ/143 . 186
PFX 1026 0 فَسَتَ/143 . 186
PFX 1016 Y 6
PFX 1016 0 يَ/143 . 187
PFX 1016 0 وَيَ/143 . 187
PFX 1016 0 فَيَ/143 . 187
PFX 1016 0 سَيَ/143 . 187
PFX 1016 0 وَسَيَ/143 . 187
PFX 1016 0 فَسَيَ/143 . 187
PFX 1042 Y 3
PFX 1042 0 لِتَ/143 . 188
PFX 1042 0 وَلِتَ/143 . 188
PFX 1042 0 فَلِتَ/143 . 188
PFX 1029 Y 6
PFX 1029 0 تُ/143 . 189
PFX 1029 0 وَتُ/143 . 189
PFX 1029 0 فَتُ/143 . 189
PFX 1029 0 سَتُ/143 . 189
PFX 1029 0 وَسَتُ/143 . 189
PFX 1029 0 فَسَتُ/143 . 189
PFX 1060 Y 6
PFX 1060 0 نَ/143 . 190
PFX 1060 0 وَنَ/143 . 190
PFX 1060 0 فَنَ/143 . 190
PFX 1060 0 سَنَ/143 . 190
PFX 1060 0 وَسَنَ/143 . 190
PFX 1060 0 فَسَنَ/143 . 190
PFX 1035 Y 6
PFX 1035 0 تُ/143 . 191
PFX 1035 0 وَتُ/143 . 191
PFX 1035 0 فَتُ/143 . 191
PFX 1035 0 سَتُ/143 . 191
PFX 1035 0 وَسَتُ/143 . 191
PFX 1035 0 فَسَتُ/143 . 191
PFX 1014 Y 6
PFX 1014 0 يَ/143 . 192
PFX 1014 0 وَيَ/143 . 192
PFX 1014 0 فَيَ/143 . 192
PFX 1014 0 سَيَ/143 . 192
PFX 1014 0 وَسَيَ/143 . 192
PFX 1014 0 فَسَيَ/143 . 192
PFX 1046 Y 3
PFX 1046 0 لِتَ/143 . 193
PFX 1046 0 وَلِتَ/143 . 193
PFX 1046 0 فَلِتَ/143 . 193
PFX 1027 Y 6
PFX 1027 0 تُ/143 . 194
PFX 1027 0 وَتُ/143 . 194
PFX 1027 0 فَتُ/143 . 194
PFX 1027 0 سَتُ/143 . 194
PFX 1027 0 وَسَتُ/143 . 194
PFX 1027 0 فَسَتُ/143 . 194
PFX 1017 Y 6
PFX 1017 0 يُ/143 . 195
PFX 1017 0 وَيُ/143 . 195
PFX 1017 0 فَيُ/143 . 195
PFX 1017 0 سَيُ/143 . 195
PFX 1017 0 وَسَيُ/143 . 195
PFX 1017 0 فَسَيُ/143 . 195
PFX 1043 Y 3
PFX 1043 0 لِتُ/143 . 196
PFX 1043 0 وَلِتُ/143 . 196
PFX 1043 0 فَلِتُ/143 . 196
PFX 1052 Y 3
PFX 1052 0 لِتَ/143 . 197
PFX 1052 0 وَلِتَ/143 . 197
PFX 1052 0 فَلِتَ/143 . 197
PFX 1030 Y 6
PFX 1030 0 تَ/143 . 198
PFX 1030 0 وَتَ/143 . 198
PFX 1030 0 فَتَ/143 . 198
PFX 1030 0 سَتَ/143 . 198
PFX 1030 0 وَسَتَ/143 . 198
PFX 1030 0 فَسَتَ/143 . 198
PFX 1048 Y 3
PFX 1048 0 لِتَ/143 . 199
PFX 1048 0 وَلِتَ/143 . 199
PFX 1048 0 فَلِتَ/143 . 199
PFX 1062 Y 3
PFX 1062 0 لِنَ/143 . 200
PFX 1062 0 وَلِنَ/143 . 200
PFX 1062 0 فَلِنَ/143 . 200
PFX 1061 Y 6
PFX 1061 0 نُ/143 . 201
PFX 1061 0 وَنُ/143 . 201
PFX 1061 0 فَنُ/143 . 201
PFX 1061 0 سَنُ/143 . 201
PFX 1061 0 وَسَنُ/143 . 201
PFX 1061 0 فَسَنُ/143 . 201
PFX 1015 Y 6
PFX 1015 0 يُ/143 . 202
PFX 1015 0 وَيُ/143 . 202
PFX 1015 0 فَيُ/143 . 202
PFX 1015 0 سَيُ/143 . 202
PFX 1015 0 وَسَيُ/143 . 202
PFX 1015 0 فَسَيُ/143 . 202
PFX 1001 Y 2
PFX 1001 0 وَ/143 . 203
PFX 1001 0 فَ/143 . 203
PFX 1047 Y 3
PFX 1047 0 لِتُ/143 . 204
PFX 1047 0 وَلِتُ/143 . 204
PFX 1047 0 فَلِتُ/143 . 204
PFX 1038 Y 6
PFX 1038 0 تَ/143 . 205
PFX 1038 0 وَتَ/143 . 205
PFX 1038 0 فَتَ/143 . 205
PFX 1038 0 سَتَ/143 . 205
PFX 1038 0 وَسَتَ/143 . 205
PFX 1038 0 فَسَتَ/143 . 205
PFX 1059 Y 6
PFX 1059 0 لِآ/143 . 206
PFX 1059 0 وَلِآ/143 . 206
PFX 1059 0 فَلِآ/143 . 206
PFX 1059 0 لِآ/143 . 206
PFX 1059 0 وَلِآ/143 . 206
PFX 1059 0 فَلِآ/143 . 206
PFX 1053 Y 3
PFX 1053 0 لِتُ/143 . 207
PFX 1053 0 وَلِتُ/143 . 207
PFX 1053 0 فَلِتُ/143 . 207
PFX 1031 Y 6
PFX 1031 0 تُ/143 . 208
PFX 1031 0 وَتُ/143 . 208
PFX 1031 0 فَتُ/143 . 208
PFX 1031 0 سَتُ/143 . 208
PFX 1031 0 وَسَتُ/143 . 208
PFX 1031 0 فَسَتُ/143 . 208
PFX 1009 Y 3
PFX 1009 0 لِ/143 . 209
PFX 1009 0 وَلِ/143 . 209
PFX 1009 0 فَلِ/143 . 209
PFX 1049 Y 3
PFX 1049 0 لِتُ/143 . 210
PFX 1049 0 وَلِتُ/143 . 210
PFX 1049 0 فَلِتُ/143 . 210
PFX 1036 Y 6
PFX 1036 0 تَ/143 . 211
PFX 1036 0 وَتَ/143 . 211
PFX 1036 0 فَتَ/143 . 211
PFX 1036 0 سَتَ/143 . 211
PFX 1036 0 وَسَتَ/143 . 211
PFX 1036 0 فَسَتَ/143 . 211
PFX 1063 Y 3
PFX 1063 0 لِنُ/143 . 212
PFX 1063 0 وَلِنُ/143 . 212
PFX 1063 0 فَلِنُ/143 . 212
PFX 1050 Y 3
PFX 1050 0 لِتَ/143 . 213
PFX 1050 0 وَلِتَ/143 . 213
PFX 1050 0 فَلِتَ/143 . 213
PFX 1012 Y 6
PFX 1012 0 يَ/143 . 214
PFX 1012 0 وَيَ/143 . 214
PFX 1012 0 فَيَ/143 . 214
PFX 1012 0 سَيَ/143 . 214
PFX 1012 0 وَسَيَ/143 . 214
PFX 1012 0 فَسَيَ/143 . 214
PFX 1039 Y 6
PFX 1039 0 تُ/143 . 215
PFX 1039 0 وَتُ/143 . 215
PFX 1039 0 فَتُ/143 . 215
PFX 1039 0 سَتُ/143 . 215
PFX 1039 0 وَسَتُ/143 . 215
PFX 1039 0 فَسَتُ/143 . 215
PFX 1002 Y 6
PFX 1002 0 بِ/143 . 216
PFX 1002 0 كَ/143 . 216
PFX 1002 0 وَبِ/143 . 216
PFX 1002 0 فَبِ/143 . 216
PFX 1002 0 وَكَ/143 . 216
PFX 1002 0 فَكَ/143 . 216
PFX 1000 Y 1
PFX 1000 0 0/143 . 217
PFX 1040 Y 3
PFX 1040 0 لِتَ/143 . 218
PFX 1040 0 وَلِتَ/143 . 218
PFX 1040 0 فَلِتَ/143 . 218
PFX 1024 Y 3
PFX 1024 0 لِيَ/143 . 219
PFX 1024 0 وَلِيَ/143 . 219
PFX 1024 0 فَلِيَ/143 . 219
PFX 1007 Y 6
PFX 1007 0 بِال/143 . 220
PFX 1007 0 كَال/143 . 220
PFX 1007 0 وَبِال/143 . 220
PFX 1007 0 فَبِال/143 . 220
PFX 1007 0 وَكَال/143 . 220
PFX 1007 0 فَكَال/143 . 220
PFX 1057 Y 6
PFX 1057 0 لِأَ/143 . 221
PFX 1057 0 وَلِأَ/143 . 221
PFX 1057 0 فَلِأَ/143 . 221
PFX 1057 0 لِأَ/143 . 221
PFX 1057 0 وَلِأَ/143 . 221
PFX 1057 0 فَلِأَ/143 . 221
PFX 1037 Y 6
PFX 1037 0 تُ/143 . 222
PFX 1037 0 وَتُ/143 . 222
PFX 1037 0 فَتُ/143 . 222
PFX 1037 0 سَتُ/143 . 222
PFX 1037 0 وَسَتُ/143 . 222
PFX 1037 0 فَسَتُ/143 . 222
PFX 1051 Y 3
PFX 1051 0 لِتُ/143 . 223
PFX 1051 0 وَلِتُ/143 . 223
PFX 1051 0 فَلِتُ/143 . 223
SFX 283 Y 1
SFX 283 0 ِ/144 . 224
SFX 497 Y 5
SFX 497 0 كَ/145 . 225
SFX 497 0 كِ/145 . 225
SFX 497 0 كُما/145 . 225
SFX 497 0 كُم/145 . 225
SFX 497 0 كُنَّ/145 . 225
